Missouri, session 2026, HB2518.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 324.1175, to read as follows:
324.1175. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "DACA recipient", any individual who is protected from deportation under
the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program and who holds a valid
work authorization under the program;
(2) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, or accreditation that
enables a person to legally practice an occupation or profession in this state;
(3) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of this state that
issues licenses.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any DACA recipient who has met
all educational and professional requirements for a particular occupation or profession
for which a license is required in this state shall be eligible for licensure in that
occupation or profession on the same basis as a United States citizen or legal permanent
resident.
3. All oversight bodies shall consider license applications from DACA recipients
without regard to citizenship or immigration status.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2518 2
4. License applications from DACA recipients shall be evaluated based solely on
qualifications, education, and professional competency. DACA recipients shall not be
subject to additional or separate requirements beyond those imposed on United States
citizens or legal permanent residents.
5. DACA recipients granted licenses in accordance with the provisions of this
section shall have all the same rights, responsibilities, and protections in their respective
fields as any other licensees.
6. Any license granted in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be
renewable and valid for the same period as a license issued to a United States citizen or
legal permanent resident, provided that the licensee maintains valid work authorization.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply to all license applications submitted
on or after August 28, 2026.
8. The department of commerce and insurance, in conjunction with oversight
bodies, shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔